New York, session 2025-2026, S3284.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 862 of the general municipal law, 2 as amended by section 1 of part J of chapter 59 of the laws of 2013, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (1) No funds of the agency shall be used in respect of any project if 5 the completion thereof would result in the removal of [an industrial or 6 manufacturing] any plant, facility or personnel of the project occupant 7 from one area of the state to another area of the state [or], in the 8 abandonment of one or more plants or facilities of the project occupant 9 located within the state or the unemployment or relocation of any 10 personnel who are employed by the project occupant, provided, however, 11 that neither restriction shall apply if the agency shall determine on 12 the basis of the application before it that the project is reasonably 13 necessary to discourage the project occupant from removing such other 14 plant or facility to a location outside the state or is reasonably 15 necessary to preserve the competitive position of the project occupant 16 in its respective industry due to physical, zoning, or logistical 17 constraints at such project occupant's existing site within the state. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04755-01-5